Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.410

Transfer of system from county to water-sewer district.

A system of sewerage, system of water or combined water and sewerage systems operated by a county under the authority of this chapter may be transferred from that county to a water-sewer district in the same manner as is provided for the transfer of those functions from a water-sewer district to a county in RCW 36.94.310 through 36.94.340.

[ 1999 c 153 s 51; 1984 c 147 s 1.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—1999 c 153: See note following RCW 57.04.050.

Actions not subject to review by boundary review board: RCW 36.93.105.